Hawaii statutes.
[§346-158] No smoking in child care
facilities. Smoking shall be prohibited in all group child care homes,
group child care centers, and family child care homes during their hours of
operation. [L 1993, c 68, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next